Hawaii statutes.
§210-5 Rules and regulations. The
rules and regulations shall:

(1) Prescribe the qualifications for eligibility of
applicants for loans.

(2) Establish preferences and priorities in
determining eligibility for loans.

(3) Establish the conditions, consistent with the
purposes of this chapter, for the granting or for the continuance of a grant of
a loan.

(4) Provide for inspection, at reasonable hours, of
the plant, books, and records of an enterprise which has applied for or has
been granted a loan, and to require the submission of progress and final
reports. [L 1963, c 76, §6; Supp, §98R-6; HRS §210-5]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next